Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-4,168.01
Out-of-service order; violation; disqualification; when.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who is convicted of violating an out-of-service order while operating a commercial motor vehicle which is transporting nonhazardous materials shall be subject to disqualification as follows:

(a) A person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of at least one hundred eighty days but no more than one year upon a court conviction for violating an out-of-service order;

(b) A person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of at least two years but no more than five years upon a second court conviction for violating an out-of-service order, which arises out of a separate incident, during any ten-year period; and

(c) A person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of at least three years but no more than five years upon a third or subsequent court conviction for violating an out-of-service order, which arises out of a separate incident, during any ten-year period.

(2) A person who is convicted of violating an out-of-service order while operating a commercial motor vehicle which is transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded pursuant to section 75-364 or while operating a commercial motor vehicle designed or used to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver, shall be subject to disqualification as follows:

(a) A person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of at least one hundred eighty days but no more than two years upon conviction for violating an out-of-service order; and

(b) A person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of at least three years but no more than five years upon a second or subsequent conviction for violating an out-of-service order, which arises out of a separate incident, during any ten-year period.

(3) For purposes of this section, out-of-service order has the same meaning as in section 75-362.

(4) Each period of disqualification imposed under this section shall be served consecutively and separately.

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB204, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 69.